Maryland, session 2025, HB0764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
12–902.
There is a Prince George’s Gateway Development Authority in Prince George’s
County.
Chapter 466 of the Acts of 2023
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0764*

HOUSE BILL 764
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2023. [It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of
September 30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.]
Chapter 467 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2023. [It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of
September 30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.